ru: Тип дросселя электросамоката: Кнопочный; Ножной; Под большой палец; Курковый; Поворотная ручка; Другое
el: Τύπος ηλεκτρικού σκούτερ: Κουμπί; Ποδιού; Αντίχειρα; Σκανδάλης; Περιστροφικό; Άλλο
es: Tipo de acelerador de patinete eléctrico: Botón; Pie; Pulgar; Gatillo; Giro; Otro
it: Monopattino elettrico limitato tipo: Pulsante; A pedale; A pollice; A grilletto; A manopola; Altro
ro-RO: Tipul de accelerație al trotinetei electrice: Buton; Picior; Degetul mare; Trăgaci; Manșon rotativ; Altele
nl: E-scooter gashendel type: Knop; Voet; Duim; Trigger; Draai; Anders
vi: Loại tay ga xe điện: Nút; Chân; Ngón cái; Cò bóp; Tay vặn; Khác
de: Art des E-Scooter-Gasgriffs: Button; Fuß; Daumen; Trigger; Drehgriff; Sonstige
zh-TW: 電動滑板車油門類型: 按鈕式; 腳踏式; 拇指撥片式; 扳機式; 轉把式; 其他
nb: El-sparkesykkel strupet type: Knapp; Fot; Tommel; Avtrekker; Vri; Annet
hr-HR: Električni skuter ograničenog tipa: Gumb; Nožni; Za palac; Okidač; Zakretni; Ostalo
tr: E-scooter gaz kontrol türü: Düğme; Ayak; Başparmak; Tetik; Döndürme; Diğer
fr: Type d’accélérateur de trottinette électrique: Bouton; Pied; Pouce; Gâchette; Poignée tournante; Autre
zh-CN: 电动滑板车油门类型: 按钮; 脚踏; 拇指拨把; 扳机; 转把; 其他
sl-SI: Električni skuter omejenega tipa: Gumb; Noga; Palec; Sprožilec; Vrtljivo; Drugo
pl: Typ manetki gazu do hulajnogi elektrycznej: Przycisk; Nożna; Kciukowa; Cynglowa; Obrotowa (manetka); Inna
sv: Elscooter av gränstyp: Knapp; Fot; Tumme; Avtryckare; Vrid; Övrigt
en: E-scooter throttle type: Button; Foot; Thumb; Trigger; Twist; Other
lt-LT: Elektrinio paspirtuko akceleratoriaus tipas: Mygtukas; Kojinis; Nykščiu valdomas; Paleidiklis; Sukamas; Kita
ko: 전동 스쿠터 스로틀 유형: 버튼; 발; 엄지; 트리거; 트위스트; 기타
cs: Typ páčky plynu elektrické koloběžky: Tlačítko; Nožní; Palcový; Spoušťový; Otočný; Ostatní
pt-BR: Tipo de acelerador de patinete elétrico: Botão; Pé; Polegar; Gatilho; Torção; Outro
fi: Sähköpotkulaudan kaasukahvatyyppi: Painike; Jalka; Peukalo; Liipaisin; Kääntyvä; Muu
da: Gashåndtagstype på el-løbehjul: Knap; Fod; Tommelfinger; Udløser; Gashåndtag; Anden
pt-PT: Tipo de acelerador da trotineta elétrica: Botão; Pé; Polegar; Acionador; Rotação; Outro
sk-SK: Typ akcelerátora elektrickej kolobežky: Tlačidlo; Nožný pedál; Palcová páčka; Páčka (spúšť); Otočná rukoväť; Iné
hu: Az e-robogó gázkar-típusa: Gombos; Lábos; Hüvelykujjas; Ravaszos; Markolatos; Egyéb
ja: 電動スクータースロットルタイプ: ボタン; フット; サム; トリガー; ツイスト; その他
bg-BG: Тип газ на електрическа тротинетка: Бутон; Крачен; За палец; Спусък; Въртящ се; Друго
th: ประเภทคันเร่งสกูตเตอร์ไฟฟ้า: ปุ่ม; เท้า; นิ้วหัวแม่มือ; ทริกเกอร์; แบบบิด; อื่นๆ